nl: Motormontage type: Actief / elektronisch; Gecombineerde motor- en transmissiesteun; Hydraulisch; Rubber; Massief / stijf; Reactiearm / dogbone; Overig
zh-CN: 发动机支架类型: 主动/电子式; 发动机和变速箱组合支架; 液压; 橡胶; 实心/刚性; 扭矩支柱/狗骨状支架; 其他
cs: Typ uložení motoru: Aktivní / elektronický; Kombinovaný silentblok motoru a převodovky; Hydraulický; Gumový; Pevný / tuhý; Momentová vzpěra / záchyt reakce; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип опора на двигателя: Активен/Електронен; Комбиниран тампон за двигател и трансмисия; Хидравличен; Гумен; Твърд/Масивен; Реактивна щанга (тип кокал); Друго
fi: Moottorin kiinnikkeen tyyppi: Aktiivinen / elektroninen; Moottorin ja vaihteiston yhdistetty kiinnike; Hydraulinen; Kumi; Kiinteä / jäykkä; Vääntötuki / koiranluu; Muu
pl: Typ poduszki silnika: Aktywne / elektroniczne; Zintegrowane mocowanie silnika i skrzyni biegów; Hydrauliczne; Gumowe; Pełne / sztywne; Drążek reakcyjny / ósemka; Inne
lt-LT: Variklio laikiklio tipas: Aktyvusis / elektroninis; Kombinuotas variklio ir transmisijos laikiklis; Hidraulinis; Guma; Vientisas / standus; Atraminis trauklės laikiklis (Dogbone); Kita
ru: Тип опоры двигателя: Активная/электронная; Комбинированная опора двигателя и трансмиссии; Гидравлическая; Резиновая; Цельная/жесткая; Реактивная тяга / «косточка»; Другое
th: ประเภทของแท่นเครื่องยนต์: แอ็กทีฟ/อิเล็กทรอนิกส์; แท่นยึดเครื่องยนต์และเกียร์แบบรวม; ไฮดรอลิก; ยาง; ตัน/แข็ง; ทอร์คสตรัท/กระดูกหมา; อื่นๆ
ja: エンジンマウントタイプ: アクティブ/電子制御; エンジン・トランスミッション共用マウント; 油圧式; ラバー; ソリッド/リジッド; トルクストラット/ドッグボーン; その他
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia motora: Aktívny / elektronický; Kombinovaný držiak motora a prevodovky; Hydraulický; Gumený; Pevný / tuhý; Vzpera proti krútiacemu momentu / v tvare kosti; Iné
zh-TW: 引擎腳類型: 主動式/電子式; 引擎與變速箱複合腳; 液壓; 橡膠; 實心/剛性; 扭矩支撐桿/狗骨頭; 其他
ko: 엔진 마운트 유형: 액티브/전자식; 엔진 및 변속기 통합형 마운트; 유압식; 고무; 솔리드/리지드; 토크 스트럿/도그본; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de suporte do motor: Ativo/Eletrônico; Coxim combinado de motor e transmissão; Hidráulico; Borracha; Sólido/Rígido; Suporte de torque/raquete; Outro
tr: Motor bağlantı tipi: Aktif / Elektronik; Motor ve şanzıman kombine takozu; Hidrolik; Kauçuk; Katı / Sabit; Tork desteği / Köpek kemiği; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača motora: Aktivni / elektronički; Kombinirani nosač motora i mjenjača; Hidraulički; Gumeni; Puni / kruti; Oslonac zakretnog momenta (dogbone); Ostalo
el: Τύπος βάσης κινητήρα: Ενεργή / Ηλεκτρονική; Συνδυασμένη βάση κινητήρα & κιβωτίου ταχυτήτων; Υδραυλική; Από καουτσούκ; Μασίφ / Άκαμπτη; Βάση ροπής / Τύπου dogbone; Άλλο
fr: Type de support moteur: Actif/électronique; Support combiné moteur et transmission; Hydraulique; Caoutchouc; Solide/rigide; Biellette de reprise de couple/os de chien; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de montare a motorului: Activ / Electronic; Suport combinat motor și transmisie; Hidraulic; Cauciuc; Solid / Rigid; Suport anticuplu / bieletă (dogbone); Altele
de: Art der Motorhalterung: Aktiv / elektronisch; Kombiniertes Motor- und Getriebelager; Hydraulisch; Gummi; Starr; Drehmomentstütze / Knochen; Sonstige
da: Motorophængstype: Aktiv / elektronisk; Kombineret motor- og gearkasseophæng; Hydraulisk; Gummi; Massiv / stiv; Momentarm / kødben; Andet
hu: Motortartó típusa: Aktív / elektronikus; Kombinált motor- és sebességváltó-tartó; Hidraulikus; Gumi; Tömör / merev; Nyomatéktámasz / kutyacsont; Egyéb
es: Tipo de soporte del motor: Activo/electrónico; Soporte combinado de motor y transmisión; Hidráulico; Caucho; Sólido/rígido; Puntal de torsión/hueso de perro; Otro
it: Tipo di montaggio del motore: Attivo / elettronico; Supporto combinato motore e trasmissione; Idraulico; Gomma; Solido / rigido; Supporto antirotazione / a osso di cane; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta nosilca motorja: Aktivno / elektronsko; Kombinirani nosilec motorja in menjalnika; Hidravlični; Gumijasti; Masivni / togi; Navorna opornica; Drugo
vi: Loại giá đỡ động cơ: Chủ động / Điện tử; Giá đỡ kết hợp động cơ và hộp số; Thủy lực; Cao su; Đặc / Cứng; Cản mô-men xoắn / Dogbone; Khác
en: Engine mount type: Active / Electronic; Engine & Transmission Combined Mount; Hydraulic; Rubber; Solid / Rigid; Torque Strut / Dogbone; Other
nb: Motorfestetype: Aktiv / elektronisk; Kombinert motor- og girkassefeste; Hydraulisk; Gummi; Solid / stiv; Momentstag / hundeben; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte do motor: Ativo / Eletrónico; Apoio combinado do motor e da transmissão; Hidráulico; Borracha; Sólido / Rígido; Braço de torção / "Dogbone"; Outro
sv: Motorfästestyp: Aktiv/elektronisk; Kombinerat motor- och växellådsfäste; Hydraulisk; Gummi; Solid/styv; Momentstag/hundben; Annat